Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4615
Expedited hearing.

If a motion to grant custodial responsibility is filed under subsection (b) of section 43-4614 before a deploying parent deploys, the court shall conduct an expedited hearing.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 15.